Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.254

Advisory council on adult education—Workforce training and education coordinating board to monitor.

(1) There is hereby created the Washington advisory council on adult education. The advisory council shall advise the state board for community and technical colleges and the workforce training and education coordinating board concerning adult basic education and literacy programs. The advisory council shall perform all duties of state advisory councils on adult education as specified in P.L. 100-297, as amended. The advisory council's actions shall be consistent with the state comprehensive plan for workforce training and education prepared by the workforce training and education coordinating board as provided for in RCW 28C.18.060.

(2) The advisory council on adult education shall consist of nine members as required by federal law, appointed by the governor. In making these appointments, to the maximum extent feasible, the governor shall give consideration to providing overlapping membership with the membership of the state job training coordinating council, and the governor shall give consideration to individuals with expertise and experience in adult basic education.

(3) The workforce training and education coordinating board shall monitor the need for the council as described in subsection (1) of this section, and, if that need no longer exists, propose legislation to terminate the council.

[ 1991 c 238 s 19.]